Maine, session 132, LD921.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA c. 41 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 41
CONDUCTING JUCICIAL PROCEEDINGS BY ELECTRONIC MEANS
§2001. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Electronic means. "Electronic means" means the use of telephone, Internet or other
remote audio and video communication technologies to conduct hearings or other judicial
proceedings at which attorneys, parties and witnesses participate without being present in
the same physical location as the court.
2. Hearings and other judicial proceedings. "Hearings and other judicial
proceedings" includes all hearings and other court proceedings conducted by the District
Court, Superior Court and Supreme Judicial Court.
3. Hybrid means. "Hybrid means" means the use of telephone, Internet or other
remote audio and video communication technologies to conduct hearings or other judicial
proceedings at which one or more, but not all, attorneys, parties and witnesses participate
without being present in the same physical location as the court.
§2002. Use of electronic means
1. Required use of electronic means. Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3, the
following hearings and other judicial proceedings must be conducted by electronic means:
A. Pretrial conferences;
B. Motion hearings and status hearings;
C. Mediations and judicial settlement conferences; and
D. Any other hearing or judicial proceeding in which in-person attendance is not
required to provide due process in a fair and just manner.
2. Exceptions. Criminal trials and civil jury trials requiring the presentation of physical
evidence may not be conducted by electronic means without the consent of each party to
the proceeding and the approval of the court.
3. Judicial determination electronic means inappropriate. A court may order that a
specific hearing or other judicial proceeding identified in subsection 1 be conducted in
person or through hybrid means if the complexity of the matter, the need for in-person
testimony or other relevant factors support a finding that conducting the hearing or other
judicial proceeding by electronic means is inappropriate because it would result in a
deprivation of due process, fairness or justice.
4. Accommodations. A court shall provide reasonable accommodations to an
individual with limited access to the technology required to participate by electronic means
as well as an individual with a disability that limits the individual's ability to fully
Page 1 - 132LR1882(01)

319 participate by electronic means. Accommodations under this subsection may include a
420 court order that a specific hearing or other judicial proceeding be conducted by hybrid
431 means during which the affected individual, the affected individual's attorney and other
442 specified attorneys, parties or witnesses are permitted or required to appear in person.
5. Technology and training. The judicial branch shall ensure that the technology
necessary to conduct hearings and other judicial proceedings by electronic means is
available in each District Court, Superior Court and Supreme Judicial Court courthouse in
the State. The judicial branch shall provide training and technical assistance to allow
judges and justices, court staff, attorneys, parties and witnesses to effectively use the
technology selected for conducting hearings and other judicial proceedings by electronic
means.
§2003. Report; rulemaking
1. Annual report. The Supreme Judicial Court shall, by January 15, 2026 and
annually thereafter, submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over judiciary matters on the use of electronic means to conduct
hearings and other judicial proceedings. The report must include, at a minimum, the
following:
A. Statistics on the number and types of hearings and other judicial proceedings
conducted by electronic means in the preceding calendar year;
B. An estimate of the cost savings achieved by the judicial branch and the cost savings
for attorneys, parties and witnesses as a result of conducting hearings and other judicial
proceedings by electronic means in the preceding calendar year;
C. Information collected from surveys and other means providing feedback from
judges and justices, court staff, attorneys, parties and witnesses on the conduct of
hearings and other judicial proceedings by electronic means; and
D. Any recommendations for improving or adjusting the use of electronic means to
conduct hearings and other judicial proceedings.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters
may report out legislation in response to the report to any regular or special session of the
Legislature.
2. Rules. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Supreme Judicial
Court may adopt rules and issue orders to implement this chapter. After the effective date
of the rules as adopted or amended, all laws in conflict with the rules are of no further
effect.
§2004. Construction
The provisions of this chapter must be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes
of this chapter.
Sec. 2. Report regarding laws no longer in effect. The Supreme Judicial Court,
by December 3, 2025, shall submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee on Judiciary
detailing those provisions of the Maine Revised Statutes that are rendered of no effect due
to the actions taken by the Supreme Judicial Court pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 4, chapter 41. The joint standing committee may report out a bill based on the report
to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Page 2 - 132LR1882(01)